Illinois, session 104th, HB4845.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5adding Section 8-2001.10 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/8-2001.10 new)7    Sec. 8-2001.10. Authorization for release of an 8incapacitated person's records. 9    (a) In addition to disclosure allowed under Section 8-802, 10an incapacitated person's health care records must be released 11upon written request of the guardian of the incapacitated 12person's or by an agent appointed by the incapacitated person 13under a power of attorney for health care. If no guardian or 14agent exists, and the incapacitated person did not 15specifically object to disclosure of the incapacitated 16person's records in writing, then an incapacitated person's 17health care records must be released upon the written request 18of a person, who is considered to be a personal representative 19of the patient for the purpose of the release of an 20incapacitated patient's health care records, in one of these 21categories: 22        (1) the incapacitated person's spouse; or23        (2) if there is no spouse, any one or more of the   HB4845- 2 -LRB104 17026 JRC 30441 b1    following:2            (A) an adult child of the incapacitated person;3            (B) a parent of the incapacitated person; or4            (C) an adult sibling of the incapacitated person.5    (b) Health care facilities and practitioners are 6authorized to provide a copy of an incapacitated patient's 7records based upon a person's payment of the statutory fee and 8signed Authorized Relative Certification, attesting to the 9fact that the person is authorized to receive such records 10under this Section.11    (c) Any person who, in good faith, relies on a copy of an 12Authorized Relative Certification has the same immunities from 13criminal and civil liability as those who rely on a power of 14attorney for health care as provided by State law.15    (d) Upon request for records of an incapacitated person, 16the named authorized relative shall provide the facility or 17practitioner with a statement of a treating health care 18provider that the person is incapacitated as defined in the 19Illinois Power of Attorney Act and a certification in 20substantially the following form:21AUTHORIZED RELATIVE CERTIFICATION 22    I, (insert name of authorized relative), certify that I am 23an authorized relative of (insert name of incapacitated 24person). (A statement of the treating health care provider 25must be attached).26    I certify that to the best of my knowledge and belief that   HB4845- 3 -LRB104 17026 JRC 30441 b1no guardian has been appointed for the incapacitated person, 2that no agent was authorized to act for the incapacitated 3person under a power of attorney for health care, and the 4incapacitated person has not specifically objected to 5disclosure in writing.6    I certify that I am the spouse of the incapacitated 7person; or8    I certify that there is no spouse and my relationship to 9the incapacitated person is (circle one):10        (1) An adult child of the incapacitated person.11        (2) Either parent of the incapacitated person.12        (3) An adult child of the incapacitated person.13    I certify that I am seeking the records as a personal 14representative who is acting in a representative capacity and 15who is authorized to seek these records under Section 168-2001.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure.17    This certification is made under penalty of perjury.18    Dated: (insert date)19    .........................................................20    (Print Authorized Relative's Name)21    .........................................................22    (Authorized Relative's Signature)23    .........................................................24    (Authorized Relative's Address) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.